Florida, session 2026, SB1242.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âSection 11 of chapter 2024-246, Laws of Florida, 26 is amended to read: 27 Section 11.â(1)âEffective upon this act becoming a law and 28 notwithstanding any provision of s. 381.986(8)(a)2.b., Florida 29 Statutes, to the contrary, the Department of Health must grant 30 an applicant 90 days to cure, pursuant to the errors and 31 omissions process established in department Form DH8035-OMMU 32 10/2021 as incorporated by the department in rule 64ER21-16, 33 Florida Administrative Code, any remaining deficiencies cited by 34 the department regarding the application if the applicant: 35 (a)âApplied for a medical marijuana treatment center 36 license during the application window created by the department 37 to accept applications for licensure pursuant to s. 38 381.986(8)(a)2.b., Florida Statutes; and 39 (b)âHas not been awarded a license, either from the initial 40 application process or through the cure process established in 41 section 2 of chapter 2023-292, Laws of Florida. 42 (2)âIf the applicant cures the deficiencies within the 90 43 day timeframe, the department must issue a medical marijuana 44 treatment center license to the applicant. 45 (3)âFor purposes of the cure process detailed in 46 subsections (1) and (2), the department must consider all 47 deficiencies with an applicantâs application to be cured if the 48 sole remaining deficiency cited is: 49 (a)âA failure to meet the requirement in s. 50 381.986(8)(b)1., Florida Statutes; or 51 (b)âThe applicant died after March 25, 2022. In the case of 52 the death of an applicant under this paragraph, the department 53 must issue the license to the heirs of the applicant; or 54 (c)âThe application was submitted by an entity in legal 55 partnership with a recognized class member eligible for 56 licensure under s. 381.986(8)(a)2.b., Florida Statutes, or his 57 or her heir, rather than by the recognized class member or heir 58 as an individual. 59 (4)âIf an applicant who was alive as of February 1, 2024, 60 dies before the completion of the cure process detailed in 61 subsections (1) and (2), the death of the applicant may not be a 62 reason to deny the application during the cure process or any 63 resulting legal challenges. In such case, and in the event of a 64 successful cure or challenge, the department must issue the 65 license to the estate of the applicant. 66 (5)âIf an applicant was an entity in a legal partnership 67 with a recognized class member eligible for licensure under s. 68 381.986(8)(a)2.b., Florida Statutes, or his or her heir, the 69 fact that the recognized class member or his or her heir did not 70 submit the application as an individual may not be a reason to 71 deny the application. Such an applicant satisfies the 72 requirement of s. 381.986(8)(b)1., Florida Statutes, if the 73 entity in legal partnership with a recognized class member or 74 his or her heir had been registered to do business in this state 75 for 5 consecutive years before submitting the application. 76 Provided all other applicable requirements for licensure have 77 been met, the department must issue the license to the applicant 78 no later than July 1, 2026. 79 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.